Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB123.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 186 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) All written examinations and road skills tests administered to applicants for an
instruction permit or operator's license shall be in English only.
(2) An applicant shall not use the following during a written examination:
(a) A translation dictionary;
(b) An electronic device; or
(c) An interpreter.
Section 2. KRS 186.480 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Department of Kentucky State Police shall examine every applicant for an
operator's license as identified in KRS 186.635, except as otherwise provided in this
section. The examination shall be held in the county where the applicant resides
unless:
(a) The applicant is granted written permission by the Transportation Cabinet to
take the examination in another county; or
(b) The applicant is tested using a bioptic telescopic device.
(2) (a) The examination shall include a test of the applicant's eyesight to ensure
compliance with the visual acuity and visual field standards set forth in KRS
186.577. The vision testing outlined in this subsection shall be administered
under the provisions established in KRS 186.577 at, or prior to, the time of
application.
(b) The examination shall also include a test of the applicant's ability to read and
understand highway signs regulating, warning, and directing traffic, the
applicant's knowledge of traffic laws, and an actual demonstration of the
Page 1 of 3
XXXX 1/20/2026 12:05 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1776
applicant's ability to exercise ordinary and reasonable control in the operation
of a motor vehicle.
(c) All examinations and skills testing required by this section shall be
administered in accordance with Section 1 of this Act.
(d) The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to an applicant who:
1.[(a)] At the time of application, holds a valid operator's license from
another state, provided that state affords a reciprocal exemption to a
Kentucky resident;
2.[(b)] At the time of application for a motorcycle instruction permit or
motorcycle operator's license, presents evidence of successful
completion of an approved rider training course under KRS 176.5062;
or
3.[(c)] Is a citizen of the Commonwealth who has been serving in the
United States military and has allowed his or her operator's license to
expire.
(3) In addition to the requirements of subsection (2) of this section, an applicant for a
motorcycle operator's license who does not present evidence of successful
completion of an approved rider training course under KRS 176.5062 shall be
required to show his or her ability to operate a motorcycle. An applicant who
successfully completes the skills portion of the test under this subsection on a:
(a) Three (3) wheeled motorcycle shall be issued a motorcycle operator's license
restricted to the operation of three (3) wheeled motorcycles under KRS
186.447; or
(b) Two (2) wheeled motorcycle shall be issued a motorcycle operator's license
without the restriction identified in KRS 186.447, and may operate both two
(2) and three (3) wheeled motorcycles.
(4) Any person whose intermediate license or operator's license is denied, suspended,
Page 2 of 3
XXXX 1/20/2026 12:05 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1776
or revoked for cause shall apply for reinstatement at the termination of the period
for which the license was denied, suspended, or revoked by submitting to the
examination. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to any person whose
license was suspended for failure to meet the conditions described in KRS 186.411
when, within one (1) year of suspension, the driving privileges of the person are
reinstated.
(5) An applicant shall not use an autocycle for road skills testing administered under
the provisions of this section.
(6) The Department of Kentucky State Police shall include, in the educational materials
it produces for prospective drivers, information about the purposes, processes, and
benefits of the organ donation program.
Page 3 of 3
XXXX 1/20/2026 12:05 PM Jacketed